src/fst/incoming/bla_noun_test.lexc
LEXICON NI_IM
@P.im.IM@@R.class.NOUN@+NI:@P.im.IM@@R.class.NOUN@0  NI_POSS_NUM ;
@R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NI:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NI:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NAD
+NAD:0  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NAD:@P.number.SG@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NAD:@P.number.PL@  NA_0_IM ;

LEXICON NAD_IM
@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

LEXICON NID
+NID:0  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NID:@P.number.SG@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NID:@P.number.PL@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON NID_IM
@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! Below is the combinatorial PARADIGM for the possessive circumfixes

! POSS+stem+POSS+NUM
! POSS+stem+POSS+OBV
! stem+NUM
! stem+OBV

LEXICON NA_0_IM
@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@%>im NA_POSS ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@                              NA_POSS ;
@R.person.NULL@                                       NA_POSS ;

LEXICON NA_POSS
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@U.person.OT@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@:@U.person.NULL@      NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@%>innaan  NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@%>innoon NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@%>oaawa   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@U.person.OT@%>oaawa   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES ;

! Below is the set of verb suffixes that occur when a noun undergoes the verbalization process. (aakiiyiwa-she is a woman).
! They are only instransitive verbs. Somethings to note. I have only included the person suffixes, not the derivational suffixes.
! This verb paradigm does not include dependent nouns.

LEXICON VAI_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@ IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Third Person Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa # ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@yi   	ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@yi   		ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yini   	ENCLITICS ; ! Unknown, but following Frantz regarding the third person.
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihpinnaana  ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yio'pa	 ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yihpoaawa	 ANIM_INTERR ;  	
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi   	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yihsi   	ENCLITICS ; 
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yihsi  	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihsinnaana  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihsinnaan  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi 	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yihsoaayi	 ENCLITICS ;  
@R.person.OT@+3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yinnaaniki  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yinoainiki ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yio'ki 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi			ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi			ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yihtopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yihtopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopini   ENCLITICS ;	
! Plural UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihpinnaanopi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihpoaawopi 	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yiwahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;   
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyini    ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular IMPERATIVE
+Sg:%>t	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural IMPERATIVE
+Pl:%>k	ENCLITICS ;

! BELOW ARE THE VII SUFFIXES

LEXICON VII_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES
! Inanimate Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waistsaawa # ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa		ENCLITICS ;
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi		ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Sg:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi 		ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Pl:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi	ENCLITICS ;	

LEXICON SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi			ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopi	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural UNREAL  
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES
! Singular
@D.number.PL@ NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ;
! Obviative
@R.person.NULL@+Obv:@R.person.NULL@%>yi # ; ! Optional obviative with non-possessed form
@D.person.NULL@@U.person.OT@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@U.person.OT@%>yi # ; ! Obligatory obviative with 3rd person possessor
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.OT@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.OT@%>yi # ; ! Optional obviative with non-3rd possessor
! Plural
@D.number.SG@@D.person.OT@+Pl:@D.number.SG@@D.person.OT@%>iksi # ; ! Optional plural for non-3rd possessor and non-possessed
! Non-Referring
@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@+Non:@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@%>i # ; ! Optional non-referring suffix, number unrestricted

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.person.OT@@D.number.PL@+Sg:@D.person.OT@@D.number.PL@%>wa # ; ! Optional singular for non-3rd person possessed, non-plural only

LEXICON NI_POSS_NUM
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@U.person.OT@0   NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@:@U.person.NULL@                NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@%>innaan  NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@%>innoon NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@%>oaawa  NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@U.person.OT@%>oaawa   NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES ;
